Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska18-2432
Power projects; appeal; procedure.

An appeal of any final action of the Nebraska Power Review Board pursuant to the Municipal Cooperative Financing Act may be taken to the Court of Appeals. Such appeal shall be in accordance with rules provided by law for appeals in civil cases.

Laws 1981, LB 132, § 32;

Laws 1981, LB 181, § 61;

Laws 1991, LB 732, § 21;

Laws 2003, LB 187, § 6.